
I'm pissed off about it every day
Focus, 2023

Boel Godner (S) is KSO in Södertälje, one of the most immigrant-dense municipalities in the country.
She sees an important reason why segregation in Sweden has become so deep.

On a few occasions during my conversations with Boel Godner, she crosses her arms,
frowns and says something sharp and dismissive, like: »I don't understand
what you mean when you say that.« Or, more emphatically: »I don't want to talk about
that way!« There is a noticeably bad atmosphere in the meeting room in Södertälje municipal hall
and for a moment, I get my mother to raise me a little inside so as not to let go
the questions that annoy her. Otherwise, this tanned local politician is in a blazer
and jeans friendly accommodating. That's when I ask questions about immigration
to which she sizzles. By all accounts, it is a spontaneous reaction in the moment - at the same time
is Boel Godner a conscious politician and chairman of the municipal board (KSO)
in one of Sweden's most immigrant-dense municipalities. In an interview like this, it has to
clearly show that she is in opposition to SD and that her criticism of Sweden's
migration policy in recent years should not be seen as criticism of immigration
per se. She has been a social democrat since her teens but enjoys respect from colleagues
across the entire political spectrum. For many years, she has struggled with our times
key issues - migration, segregation, school, organized crime, labor market.
She has skin on her nose, is relatively outspoken and has a know-how that
is in demand. It is now twelve years since she, as a 45-year-old, assumed the role of the municipal board
chairman of the S-marked municipality with more than forty percent foreign-born
residents plus fifteen percent with roots in other countries. Only Botkyrka and Malmö
have similar numbers. WHEN SHE TOOK OFFICE IN 2011, Södertälje faced a series of challenges.
During the Iraq war at the beginning of the 2000s, they had the largest reception of refugees
in Sweden's history in such a short time, says Godner. Eight thousand Iraqis
came to Södertälje in a few years. The schools had poor results, unemployment
was the highest in Sweden, as was the loan debt. The trials against the notorious Södertälje network
started that year. The dissatisfaction of the residents that it came to this
many refugees grew and there was not enough housing for everyone.
Södertälje received more refugees from the Iraq war than the USA and Canada did
together. People around the world were interested in how the small Swedish municipality
handled the situation. - I received solid media training right from the start,
through the fact that in my first years at the post office I had to receive 150 media from other countries,
from Germany to Japan. It was just a matter of picking up the school German. She looks refreshed
out by memory. Just as all Iraqis during the war had automatically received
permanent residence permit here, Sweden promised the same to people from
Syria when the war broke out there in 2011. - Then we knew that thousands of Syrians would come
to Södertälje. It was of course incredibly difficult. I think you already
then should have talked about the systems for migration that Sweden has, which are completely unique
in the world. System that made it possible to segregate Sweden into just a few
year. Unbelievable! She laughs, almost resigned. Then it flashes in the eyes.
- I am so pissed off about it, every day! Still.Godner refers mainly to
the ebo law (the law on own housing), a topic she will return to time and time again
during our interviews. If she brings a single talking point to this interview
so is the message that the right for asylum seekers to choose their own accommodation was like
preferably in the country is the root of the evil segregation. It enables newcomers to
opt out of the Migration Agency's accommodation and introduction to Swedish society
- to be housed with friends or relatives instead.- The Ebo law is unique for
Sweden. It sounds so good with freedom of choice for those who come, but the result is
that the new arrivals are introduced to Sweden by someone who himself came last year. And
that people crowd together. An area with us swelled with 4,000 inhabitants, without
that a single new home was built. It also allows people to be exploited with blacks
leases and usurious rents. Boel Godner says she tried to get all the govt
since 2011 to change the legislation, but that no one has wanted. Until
In 2016, municipalities could also choose whether they wanted to receive migrants or not. During
several years, 14 of Sweden's 290 municipalities accounted for the majority of refugee reception.-
What you can think is that when politicians or journalists do not see a problem
outside their own door, they don't care as much. An example of the opposite
is when begging came to Sweden. In three days it became the largest and most important
issue in the country. To me it seemed awfully strange, given that alienation
and the segregation we saw among immigrants and asylum seekers in Södertälje.
THE BEGGARS WHO SIT on every street corner, or the vulnerable EU citizens as they came
to be called, became a hot and attention-grabbing political issue almost immediately. The government
appointed a national coordinator in 2015 and the media closely covered the issue. While
the overcrowding and vulnerability of many more or less new arrivals to Sweden
on the other hand, it continued to grow in silence. - Begging was the small thing for us in Södertälje,
says Boel Godner dryly. According to her, the migration to Sweden began
perceived as a problem only when more municipalities would need to have a reception.
While Södertälje received 10,000 people in ten years, Nacka had received
600.- After 2016 it was suddenly to be distributed between more municipalities and then it was
what a great life. There were also protests against the reception of refugees in general.
But not in Södertälje. Here we have only criticized the wretched systems that provide
a bad start. Does the actual number of migrants who come every year play any role
the possibilities for integration and a good reception in Sweden? - If you thought
that Södertälje could receive 10,000, surely the other municipalities can receive the same
many. Surely there must be some justice in this world. You don't like to talk
about volumes?- No, I don't like to make people into a mass, as you can
talk about like that. Stigmatizing immigration is a dangerous development
and refugee reception. The ability to maintain popular support
because the right to asylum can be difficult. Above all, it makes a lot of people feel
outside and questioned, as if they are part of the »volume«. It's terrible.
Do you think there is any limit at all to how many migrants Sweden can accept?
- Why do I have to talk like that! she exclaims annoyed. Why should I need to?
say that? "The thousand goes well", no, I'm not saying that, it doesn't work that way in mine
head. We have started a new school class a month for many years, and I say
not that it works very well, but it can be done. But it is clear that we
saw the downsides of people not coming in an orderly manner. Boel Godner says that people
who flee here and think it will be wonderful instead are exploited
in a black housing market and a black labor market. - It is not worthy
Sweden. In addition to the ebo law, Boel Godner points to the labor immigration law
as a cause of exploitation and social misery.- There is no precedent anywhere
in the world because that law is uniquely liberal, it has no restrictions.
Everyone knows that there are millions of people on earth who have it bad
where they are and long for Sweden. If there is an opportunity then it will come
man to use it. And there is this. Labor immigration will be needed,
always, but it should not be possible to cheat, so that you pay for
a work permit or contract. I think that's disgusting. Do you think that if
Sweden removes the ebo law and changes the rules around labor immigration and so on
everything to be solved, also with a migration at the level we have today?- Of course
not everything will work out, says Boel Godner. Sweden is segregated now. We
must of course continue to expand schools and welfare. But we have to stop
talk about the immigrants as if they are a special kind of people. Such communication
segregates itself. We must have an inclusive tone because we, all of us from Södertälje,
must be able to take responsibility for our place on earth. We are all together. Hers
criticism and at this point years of struggle against what she perceives as flaws
in today's migration system have not been heard, she states. - They have not
listened to us. We have been alone. Why haven't the national politicians listened?
Many probably thought it was great that the new arrivals ended up in Södertälje or
in residential areas in Stockholm, Malmö and Gothenburg, as well as in Hultsfred and Filipstad
and a few more cities that were in this club of reception. But we
need to talk about the systems, rather than the number of migrants. We have been so careful
that the EU countries should help each other, but for a long time no one took up that Sweden's municipalities
should be helped. Boel Godner says that the only integration minister who has done something
for Södertälje, Erik Ullenhag from the former People's Party, today's ambassador
in Tel Aviv. He was integration minister in Fredrik Reinfeldt's moderate-led coalition government.
- He took responsibility for visiting Södertälje and learning more. And saw
to the fact that we received extra money because we received so many. No minister has
done anything for us, neither before nor after. Honor to whom honor is due. Many are like
said curious about Boel Godner's experiences from the last decade. Södertälje
is seen as a good example for municipalities across the country that have to deal with refugee reception.
There is also interest from politicians at national level. She has been invited
into roundtable talks with governments of different colours. She tells everyone
thought things would go wrong with Södertälje. - We were in a bad way in 2011. Had
second lowest school results in Sweden. People blamed immigrants, children from other countries.
It was a really scary atmosphere here then. But did the problems have anything to do with it
with the unusually large migration in the preceding years?- To some extent had
they know that, but you shouldn't even ... talk like that. It's not the children's fault. They are right
to his schooling. Our mission was to ensure that all children received an equivalent
school. WHEN BOEL GODNER took office as KSO, the school became a priority target. One
new director of education was recruited in the same vein and when he asked what was expected
of him she replied:- We expect miracles at school. What need
you to perform it? "Political support," he said. We had lots of goals in the budget
then, but put them all down and bet on just one. That the primary school results would
improve. Or by the way, we switched to three goals: School, school and school.
It was decided that Södertälje would save on all other activities. MAN
invested in hiring the country's best teachers, they were paid much higher than others
and influence over teaching. All so-called »projects« at school were finished,
says Boel Godner contentedly.- Out with gangsters who came to lecture and grandfather
that scrapped around! Instead, the money went to the teachers and quality work. 2018
we reached the national average in terms of school results. We had a great school trip
and I have had the opportunity to tell about it in many different contexts. According to
Boel Godner is youth unemployment in Södertälje almost gone today and unemployment
has generally decreased by five, six percent. If you pass high school like that
are there jobs in Södertälje, at Astra or Scania or in other industries,
she explains. - It's getting better and better. It's an important thing to talk about.
That everything starts at school. And that the Swedish language is the key. It's Swedish like
applies to our schools. Have you put extra effort into teaching Swedish? - You can
enough to say. We have tried to get every child into preschool from the age of one. Regardless
whether the parents have a job or not, all children in Södertälje have the right to
24 hours of childcare a week. It is good for the language and for the community
enough pre-school teachers who speak Swedish? - It is a challenge. Adults like
do not speak Swedish need jobs and we need to hire them. We have arranged language support
during working hours. The staff may take Swedish courses. In the main, we have it in care for the elderly
Gene. As a municipality, we have to work like that. Not everyone has read their Swedish for immigrants
(SFI) but this works. It's wonderful. BOEL GODNER WAS born in 1966 and
grew up in a small village in the countryside outside Kalmar. Around the house there were cow pens, sheep farmers
and pig farm. The mother was a teacher and the father an engineer. They were both social democrats.
The mother came from a family that had been politically involved in various ways since then
a hundred years ago.- Grandfather's father was a right-wing man and deputy chairman of the municipal board.
Grandfather himself became a blacksmith and a communist. Grandma was a populist. What becomes
then if you cross a communist and a people's party? A social democrat, like mine
mother became, haha. Her father grew up in the poor farming country of Scania. He
had a reading head and the whole village embraced him, made sure he got to study. Gradually
he became manager of Skånska Cementgjuteriet in Rockneby. In the home often occurred
political discussions. Boel Godner himself was recruited to SSU already in high school.
She became chairman in Kalmar and became involved in the anti-apartheid movement on
The 1980s. Started studying to become a teacher in mathematics and NO subjects at the College of Teachers,
but interrupted the training when she was attracted to the assignment as ombudsman for
The Social Democrats in Södertälje, where she and her husband had moved in 1991. - I loved
this city from the beginning. Södertälje had been an immigrant town ever since
the post-war period. Then labor came from, among other places, Finland, and in 1967 the first arrived
the Assyrians-Syrians here. I am also very fond of industries and Scania
has been part of Södertälje for 120 years. The most important task you have as
KSO here is to promote the big industries. I usually say that Scania is
finest we have. When Boel Godner was asked if she wanted to step on that KSO hesitated
she a few days. As I said, Södertälje was a municipality at the bottom. The husband and children
urged her to accept, and she did. In all the years she has had a pair horse
in the administration. The chairman of the board of education, Elof Hans-Jons, was just over
30 when they took office at the same time. He was more reasoning by nature and she
more determined.- He became the nice young man and I became the grumpy aunt. It worked
great, we still work closely together. We don't hang out privately but have an incredible
close relationship. He is the one I trust the most. You have to have someone you know
talk to about the difficult things. When she took office, she immediately decided to
one thing: not to smile in photographs. - I wanted to build trust as a stable municipal politician.
A surtant with a furrowed brow. The first few weeks were difficult for me
was so happy about the assignment, but the situation in Södertälje was serious and I wanted to
that it would show, I wouldn't look happy in a single picture in the press.EN
A NORMAL WORKING WEEK for Boel Godner can be upwards of 70-80 hours. She often has meetings
in the evenings and weekends. She sits on the district board for the Social Democrats
and in Sweden's municipalities and regions. As well as on the board of the Employment Agency.
In addition to this, church visits, association visits, company visits. When we are going to photograph
her to this article, it will be an evening when Boel Godner and colleague Ingela
Nylund Watz is out meeting ordinary people in a simple tenant premises. Café Rosen
is the name of the initiative that takes place once a month and is kind of ambulatory
citizens' meetings, when the Social Democrats offer coffee while Södertälje residents have
opportunity to ask questions to her and other local social democratic leaders.
On this particular evening, it is estimated that around fifteen people showed up
and provides the marzipan cake, cinnamon buns and cookies. No matter is for
small things to be taken up, everything from the local waste sorting in this particular residential area
and accessibility on park roads, to what will happen with the redevelopment
in Södertälje harbour. Boel Godner answers each question in detail. Tonight will be
that usually on weekdays coming home at 8-9pm in the evening. But on Friday evenings
she almost always makes sure to be at home. Then she often watches TV. - Me
loves to watch tv. Love it! she says emphatically. So I'm sitting on the sofa.
Mainly it will be news. But also På spåret or any English detective story
or something about Churchill or the English royal house. Are you interested in that
royal? A bit out of the ordinary for a staunch social democrat, isn't it? - Yes, I am. The English
the royal house can be traced back a thousand years. I like Swedish too,
to know our history through the kings. Carl XVI Gustaf was here for a visit, by the way,
2018. He visited Södertälje for almost a whole day. Boel Godner is not alone
amused by royalty. She is also a churchgoer. - I like churches and their history
and being in that room. It's been since I was a kid, there's a whitewashed little one
church in Rockneby where I sang in the church choir and so on. Do you go to the Swedish church?-
Absolutely, I really do, especially before Christmas or if someone is going to sing. And
so I visit the Syrian Orthodox churches in Södertälje. Södertälje is one of the world's
main center of Assyrian-Syrians. This group makes up just over a third
of Södertälje's approximately 100,000 inhabitants. Boel Godner has also got involved
on the issue of having the genocide of Assyrian-Syrians a century ago recognized by
the Swedish government. MANY OF THE growing new problems that Sweden has grappled with
recent years, with welfare crime, criminal gangs, shootings and a new kind
infiltration and corruption in public administration occurred early in Södertälje.
Boel Godner says they vacuumed the municipality to find »weaknesses in the systems
«.- We found, for example, direct fraud with livelihood support and could start
counteract it. Building permission was another important point, there was room to take
bribes to grant building permits. Corruption in administration is another important issue
which we have been working with in recent years by training our employees and we talk
a lot with the group leaders about how you have to be incredibly careful about who you recruit
or gives positions. There must never be anyone who can benefit themselves.Hon
says that Södertälje started reporting welfare crimes to the police before they even existed
as a concept with the Police. - They built up their group against welfare crimes after
she thinks the biggest challenges in Södertälje are the shootings
and the black rental market. - It is a huge problem, so we are very concerned
about a population and housing census here in Södertälje. What we see in random samples
is worrying. Sweden would be served by a Lubbe Nordström.Ludvig »Lubbe«
Nordström was the radio reporter who in the 1930s traveled around and investigated how the poor
Swedes lived and then wrote a classic book about what he saw, Lort-Sverige.
- We find the same type of misery when we knock on doors before the election campaign, says Boel
Godner. It can be apartments without furniture, where a child opens and that's it
completely empty and the people who live there are completely different than the one who is written there. Is it
families of addicts you mean?- No, what I'm talking about are poor people who
are like serfs. They are not allowed to actually live there, but they are used as labor
and have to work for someone to live. In Södertälje, it can live in extreme cases
twelve or forty people in an apartment. We don't want that kind of mess.BOEL GODNER
IS a die-hard local politician. But as she herself said, many of the problems were visible as
are widely distributed today early in Södertälje. I ask how she thinks that one
road map nationally should look like the next twenty years. - We have to try to get to the bottom
in how Sweden looks, in the rapid change we have undergone in recent years.
Segregation is an important point, and what can be done about it, so that everyone feels
themselves included in our fantastic society. You need to change things that create
injustice. The control systems must work. The free school system must change, it
the right to free establishment within schools, but also care and social care, must be removed
so that it is not the companies that decide such things. She returns to time
when Lubbe Nordström lived, a century ago. Sweden then faced major societal challenges
which the politicians decided to get rid of when they built the people's home.
- We have to look at how we want it to be in twenty, thirty years and work towards it
the. As they did when they built the welfare society in the 20th century. We need
peace and order, says Boel Godner and frowns. WHEN WE TAKE
the pictures after the gathering with Södertälje residents at Café Rosen, she poses habitually,
looking harshly at the photographer. After a while I ask if we couldn't
get to see a smile - despite her decision twelve years ago. She has probably collected
accumulate enough trust capital to pay for such a small one
mimic debauchery? Just then the sun breaks through the clouds. And look there: the Municipal Board's
Chairman breaks into a smile. Name: Boel Godner. Occupation: Municipal board
chairman (S) in Södertälje. Born: 1966. Family: Old man, three adult daughters and
a dog. Lives: In a villa in Hagaberg. Hobbies: No time for such things. Running when I
not watching tv. One mile a week. Reads: Detectives. I re-read Agatha Christie
and over again. Sjöwall Wahlöö, Stig Trenter. Eats: Red meat with potatoes and bea. Drinks:
Be careful with alcohol, mostly Pepsi Max and sparkling water. Coffee. Motto: Order
and reda!Hidden talent: Can walk decently fast."» One area of ​​ours swelled up too
4,000 inhabitants, without a single new home being built. It also allows people
exploited with black leases and usurious rents.«""» We must stop talking about
they immigrated as if they are a special kind of people. Such communication segregates
itself.""

Tove Lifvendahl: Sweden has two incompatible stories
Svenska Dagbladet, 2023

Chronicle Images of Sweden

What the image of Sweden looks like depends on who you ask. And the surrounding image of one
country does not necessarily match the self-image of the nation concerned and
its population. In addition, in most countries there are several parallel images and
realities. To speak of the image in the definite singular is therefore highly doubtful.
At Engelsberg's mill, Axel and Margaret Ax:son held Johnson's foundation
a few weeks ago a seminar that examined the images of Sweden under different circumstances
eras and from different perspectives. A useful reminder was given by the Swedish Institute:
knowledge of Sweden is generally low outside our borders. Most people know
not so much about our country, not even in countries like Germany, which constitute an important
trading partner. However, we have a good reputation and rank fairly high in them
various measurements that are made about, for example, innovations, ambitions and digital development.
But as you know, high ambitions or grandiose goals say nothing
the outcome, Sweden for example belongs to the top when it comes to integration policy but
are far from world stars at integration, i.e. the job itself. Fraser Nelson,
editor-in-chief of the UK's The Spectator and recurring guest on the editorial page,
spent several days in Sweden in connection with the seminar to try to understand
the reason for the growing gang crime. In his eyes, it is something incredible
that has happened in the last decade in terms of the rise of the gangs,
crime and serious violent crimes with younger and younger perpetrators. It deletes
not his earlier image of Sweden as a paradise on earth, but the image undoubtedly has
got more - and darker - shades. Does this happen because of Sweden's openness
or despite the same, he wonders. The answer is perhaps both. Nelson emphasized
the many blue-yellow paradoxes - like we are the most individualistic country
in the world according to the World Values ​​Survey, but at the same time is strongly characterized by collectivist
impulses. That we as a nation were in a clinch with the rest of the world
the pandemic, but apparently obediently waiting for the green man at the crosswalks.
Or that we, with our admitted attraction to rational answers to all of life's questions
and practicalities, are unable to objectively analyze the social problems that
in some way can be linked to the migration, without falling to emotional
quarrel. A piece of the puzzle to understanding was offered by the historian Lars Trägårdh, who spoke
about two competing political narratives about Sweden. Knowing about them
it becomes more understandable why the ambivalence, the paradoxes and the split are so present
in Swedish social debate. One story is Sweden as a welfare society,
based on a national community, with roots in the early labor movement
20th century. Such a community is based on solidarity in the sense that everyone pulls
his straw in the stack, does the right thing for himself. Others are not a burden. The other
the story, Sweden as the international and moral superpower, has its merits
roots in human rights and came to grow strong during Olof Palme's time.
Sweden as an example, beacon and benefactor; we can tell the world how
you have to live. We take care of others who cannot do it themselves. The policy is offered differently
roles in these different stories. In the first, it can be the hero, of course
is attractive, but in the other it can appear as a superhero. It is
irresistible. As long as you keep the stories separate, it can work for a while
to run them in parallel, and manage the tensions between them. But immigration has
put the light on the incompatible elements. In line with the latter story
took up more and more space, the politicians have been torn between their ambitions with the welfare society
and the duties of the moral superpower. For in the two stories come
immigration to fulfill different kinds of function. In both cases it should be recognized that
there are vested interests, but they look different. In the welfare society, immigration can
justified by utility arguments: Sweden benefits from more strong arms and talented people
brains. A Kristina and a Karl-Oskar can just as well come in the guise of
a Fatima and a Giorgio. The integration goes quickly because the newly arrived on their
workplaces receive crash courses in both language and cultural codes
in the moral superpower almost ugly to claim that we should benefit from others;
we allow the poor and persecuted to come to us because we are good and
enlightened people. In its most extreme expressions, it has led to a reception system
which is completely focused on what Sweden is obliged to do, and not at all
on how the newcomer should be able to contribute in the best way. The two stories rub against
each other, and explains why politics has gone astray. Because you want to say welcome
to everyone who wants to come here (which from a purely human point of view is a reasonable
instinct), public welfare systems risk collapsing. Shall the equation
merge into a comprehensive welfare state with social benefits, adults must be able to work
able to support themselves. One can (and should) problematize measurement methods,
but no one would dispute that Sweden today has unsustainably many immigrants who
is supported by public subsidies and stands far from the labor market. It comes under
foreseeable time to be more refugees and economic migrants who want
come to Europe and Sweden than what Europe and Sweden are able to receive.
It is a kind of human primordial force that from time to time created, drained and transformed
communities. The mass European emigration to America that began in the 1820s
century, and in Sweden started in the 1850s, had irreversible consequences for
both the recipient country and the places that were abandoned. Although you can see it as that
Sweden was left to the most enterprising and bold of the tribe, returned about
a fifth eventually and with them (as well as the rivers of America letters that reached
Swedish post office) an invaluable influx of knowledge, ideas and other kinds
capital. A large part of the world's migration works in exactly that way even in
day. Around the talents, it's a matter of course; universities and companies fight over them. Knowledge,
capital and competence accompany people across borders. But about the recipient countries
do not have strong enough incentives and systems to capitalize
itself the resource, it inevitably becomes a financial burden. And if the integration -
the functioning coexistence - does not occur, comes immigration, especially from countries
which in terms of value is far from the destination country, lead to strains
of the kind we see now in Sweden, which the national police chief has called threatening the system.
Living in a country that has high moral ambitions is certainly not that
regret. No one can wish the opposite. But the common narrative and the political
the ambitions need to connect better. The solution is neither the big Swedish one
the welfare state, built for a homogeneous Sweden that no longer exists, or it
the international welfare state, invented more for our own sake than for others.
The answers lie in a liberal democracy, which uncompromisingly protects the citizens
fundamental freedoms and rights by maintaining an external and internal
defense. In a vital and dynamic economy that enables more types of work,
companies and employment, not least in the private sector. And in public systems adapted
after an increasingly heterogeneous population, and which does not have as its main aspiration
to even out differences, without creating incentives that everyone can respect and
find both logical and reasonable. 

How should we solve the lack of competent personnel?
Chronicle Labor immigration affects Gävleborg to the highest degree
Gefle Dagblad, 2023

At the same time as the news that fewer children are being born than in a long time, the government is investigating the tightening
conditions for labor immigration.

Two issues that may seem separate but are nevertheless connected: we are facing a shortage
competence supply. One solution to the challenge is to work more vigorously
with measures from primary school up to higher education, and focus on increased mobility
on the labor market with lowered thresholds. Another solution is to let them
who possess the skills can actually come here and work. New figures from Statistiska
The Central Agency shows that there have not been as few children born in Sweden as last year
since 2005. In 22 of the country's municipalities, not so few children have been born in 50 years
and in 20 out of 21 regions the number of children born decreased. Only in Västmanland county did it increase
the number of births compared to 2021, and only with six children. Total
it is a reduction in the whole country of 8.3 percent. Seen across the country, it increased
total population slightly, 0.7 percent compared to 2021. This can be partially explained
because fewer died, but above all because more people immigrated than emigrated.
That the government is now investigating stricter conditions for labor immigration is
completely in line with the new hard-line migration policy and a natural consequence
of governing on the Sweden Democrats' terms, but it is nevertheless regrettable that
that is the way the government chooses to go. Of all the issues to push around migration
and integration is the strangest thing to give to those who work. The consequence
of that risks hitting the whole of Sweden hard. We need immigration
and we need people to be able to come here and work. Not least if we are to pass it
the green transition in northern Sweden. Labor immigration is important for Sweden
and it is particularly important for Gävleborg, which is a county that already today has
problems with the supply of skills at the same time as having high unemployment. The match
between those who need jobs and which jobs are needed simply does not work
together. The long-term solution to work more with matching education and lower
the thresholds to the labor market will solve the need in the long run, but not now. We need
both immigration and measures in the entire education chain, and it must be worked on
with parallel. That Sweden's labor market is dysfunctional and that we are bad
on matching competence development with the deficiency strength has been known for a long time. To strangle
labor immigration will only get worse in the long run. To also take one
question of the needs of the labor market and wages that should lie with the companies and the labor market
parties and putting it with the politicians risks making the model yet
worse. To blame that there is cheating in various sectors or that Swedish
jobs should go to Swedes are flimsy arguments. 90 percent of those who come here as
labor migrants work in the shortage force. The government needs to change and
do the right thing if Sweden is to manage the skills supply. The alternative is to increase it
put the population to work by getting more people to have more children and make big investments
namely, resources for education will not be as easy or provide as quickly
results."We need immigration as well as measures in the entire education chain and
it has to be worked on in parallel."

Kettil: Let 2023 be the year when we accept and make demands
Borås Newspaper, 2022

Hello and welcome to Sweden! Here we help each other, and we expect you to contribute
as soon as you can.

The greeting could be addressed to a newborn. It takes a couple of decades before she
or he can really stand on his own two feet. The greeting can also be intended for
new arrivals, who often need a few years before they can support themselves and their families
and contribute to our common welfare. Common to both categories is
that they have the potential to develop as long as the environment provides the right support in form
of love and demands. But where our conviction that children deserve care
and education, views on immigration are often characterized by extremes; either one is
for immigration or against. It's a shame, because more nuances would be useful. Sweden
need immigration. All countries that do not want to stagnate need it, indeed
go backwards in development. Therefore, people from other countries have enriched Sweden
in many ways. This does not mean that migration is problem-free. When people are
new challenges arise in a country, that's just the way it is. It is not easy to get
to a new culture and a new language (but the fact that it is difficult is no reason to
help). However, different people have different conditions - such as, for example, a
graduate from Ukraine versus an illiterate from Somalia - which contributes to
it takes a different amount of time to become established enough that they can work and achieve their own
supply. The state has the task of facilitating the integration of new arrivals through
early and qualitative language training and sensible piloting to real jobs.
The contract includes that the newcomer in turn has a great responsibility to do his part
best to learn Swedish and become employable as quickly as possible.
That part is important and must not be neglected. But unfortunately the public has it
many ways broken in the care of people who have immigrated to Sweden.
The message was for a long time that the new arrivals were welcome but that their new homeland had
so little faith in their ability to adapt that subsidies were paid
without demands for compensation. Then came the so-called wave of refugees in 2015. More people
came here than we managed to integrate. The message soon became that the new arrivals
were not welcome, that society did not demand much from them but
that they received support from the public anyway. We know the result. A general skepticism
against immigrants grew stronger. What used to be politically incorrect
- as if immigrants would be a burden - now became commonplace. Tidöavtalet's
swedish democratic migration policy is a result of this shift, and
at the same time a reminder that the public failed to articulate
a clear return of people who have recently moved here. Take this with you
language requirements in healthcare, for example. For a long time it was a red skynke too
certain. Making demands was considered mean, even though on the contrary it can be one
way to show that you believe in the person in question. Therefore, it should be uncontroversial
to signal that, for example, nursing homes and preschools need staff regardless
origin, but that the person who is employed must master the Swedish language. This
is particularly important in childcare where children of both Swedish and immigrant parents
parents benefit from spending the days with pedagogues who speak good Swedish.
Now, parties on both the right and the left have begun to realize that language requirements in preschool
maybe not such a bad idea after all. It is excellent. At the same time, care is lacking
of newcomers' abilities elsewhere. The last few months have many
Ukrainians have been forced to flee the war, and some of them have chosen Sweden as theirs
sanctuary. Congratulations Sweden! So here we have healthy adults of working age who
who want nothing more than to work but who are not entitled to SFI education.
In addition, it takes too long before their skills are matched to the labor market,
which means they don't live where the jobs are. It's an astonishing waste
with both tax funds and human resources. When will Sweden really realize
the importance of taking advantage of everyone's skills and individual differences? A proposal
is that we start in 2023. On Saturday it is Christmas Eve. Some of us celebrate Christmas
for religious and cultural reasons, others latch onto parts of the holiday as a new tradition
in a new homeland. Others don't celebrate at all. Everything is okay as long as we respect
each other. Yes, it may sound like a cliché, but a mix of background, age,
gender, personalities, skills and so on is actually a pretty good thing. For own
part of it means, for example, that I, who celebrate Christmas, can take some time off in the days in between
and perhaps accompany the family's prospective confirmand to church when one
colleague who doesn't celebrate Christmas doesn't mind working. And in previous years it has too
As a parent of young children, getting up early has not been a sacrifice for me
New Year's Day and work when childless colleagues prefer to sleep in. That's how easy everything is
when we treat others as we ourselves want to be treated. Merry Christmas and Happy New Years
year!"When will Sweden really realize the importance of taking advantage of everyone's skills
and individual differences? One proposal is that we start in 2023."

Caption: Even new arrivals from Ukraine should have the right to SFI.

How could it turn out like this?
Karlstads Tidningen, 2022

The new bourgeois government consisting of M, KD and L - with its collaboration and
support of the Sweden Democrats - has presented an actionable program of measures
to finally deal with all the problems and challenges that have accumulated
high during the Social Democrats' eight years in power. Between the last three
the parliamentary elections, SD has grown and is now the second largest party.
For decades, Sweden ruled Europe most extreme migration policy. 21 percent of Sweden's adult population is today
born abroad, which can be compared to just under 15 percent in the US during the peak
of the migration in 1890. The foreign-born population has doubled in just
20 year. For several decades, Sweden had greater asylum immigration than any comparable
country, but without wanting to invest in the people who actually came here. The
was never, as is sometimes claimed, about the refugee chaos of 2015, but about a 30-year long one
underfunded social experiment. Over 800,000 Swedes were born in Asia
(mainly Syria, Iraq, Afghanistan and Iran) and 250,000 were born in Africa (mainly
Somalia, Eritrea and Ethiopia). But the integration has not worked at all. Of all
asylum immigrants and their relatives in the age group 20-49 who immigrated
In 2010, 49 percent had a job after ten years. After ten years, men have 21 percentage points
higher employment rate than women. There are also large differences in the employment rate
between refugee immigrants from different countries. Today we see the effects of
this wishful thinking around our country with increasing segregation, clan structures,
problems of honor, areas of exclusion and increasing gang crime with
shootings and explosions in the open street. How could it go so badly, when we wanted to
well? Well, the immigration skeptics who have been embedded in almost all parties
and who represented a large part of the Swedish people, tired and collected
stayed with the only alternative that was offered in SD. We had it established in society for a long time
narrow the opinion corridor. If you raised the issue of migration and the big one
immigration, it was easy to be accused of being racist and xenophobic.
But now a successive strange metamorphosis has occurred. Expressions and ideas as before
only uttered between a glass and a wall has today become legion in the social debate.
What can be said today could not be said ten years ago. Reality has
come to take over. A society where the climate of conversation does not allow meaningful
debate and the parties shun each other like the plague hardly promotes creative political
solutions where the substantive issues are at the center. That the opinion critical of migration
in Sweden today is largely borne by SD is a price we pay for years of
excessive immigration and lack of integration. STRANGE METAMORPHOSIS"
Expressions and ideas that used to only be expressed between a bowl and a wall have today become legion
in the social debate. What can be said today could not be said ten years ago
since."

The Tidö agreement repeats history
Gellert Tamas: As early as 1923, they tried to create the conditions for a "voluntary"
returning
Aftonbladet, 2022

I will now form a government for the whole of Sweden," said Ulf Kristersson in his government statement.
But the Tidö agreement shows a completely different reality.

This will perhaps be most clearly through the new government's "migration policy", that of the Sweden Democrats
main requirement since three decades. At the annual meeting in Norrköping in February
In 1994, the Sweden Democrats voted to recreate the "homogeneous population composition"
which was claimed to have been such an "invaluable asset" for Sweden.
The party newspaper SD-Kuriren summarized: "all ethnic strangers who came here
after 1970 must be repatriated so that Sweden can become Swedish again". Sweden Democrats
thus adopted probably the most brutal proposal in Swedish politics
history. Between 1970 and 1994, a total of 1,117,445 people immigrated. The
were these more than a million people, most Swedish citizens, as the annual meeting
unanimously voted yes to "pass" out of the country. Two years later clarified
party leader Mikael Jansson: "We are not for any voluntary return. We are
for these people to be repatriated, those who have immigrated for asylum from abroad
cultures after 1970."This has now become the basis for the policy described
on page 41 of the Tidö agreement under the heading “Review of incentive structures for
voluntary remigration."The first task will be to define who will
out of the country: "An investigation is being added into how re-migration can be strongly stimulated
and by other means increase in the case of persons residing in Sweden and
who have connections to another country and who want to return."While in 1994
Swedish Democratic General Meeting decisions were based on a specific year, are today's writings
more general - and thus also more insidious. Target is “people who
not integrated into Swedish society in terms of self-sufficiency, language or
other cultural factors."To complete the idea of ​​a state "return migration policy"
probably conflicts with a number of basic statutory civil rights
must be solved by changing these laws. The investigation is tasked to
"propose appropriate constitutional amendments". The work must be carried out quickly. The investigation
will be added as early as next spring and “legislation and implementation of proposed
measures must be completed during the mandate period 2022-2026."The money must be taken from
the aid budget, something Kristersson also highlighted in his government statement.
The new government will not only depart from the one percent target, the entire policy will
reformulated to “focus aid policy to constitute a tool
to counter irregular migration, increase returns and contribute to an effective
work for voluntary return". The countries that do not accept the "voluntary"
the returnees must be pressured to think again, via both Swedish and international channels
sanctions. The aid policy shall henceforth "act for the EU to freeze aid,
and also limit the possibilities for visa freedom, or visas in general,
for non-cooperative third countries on return and readmission issues
of its own citizens". That a political leadership works for parts of its population
must leave their own country is of course just as reprehensible as it is socially destabilizing.
The question is also what guarantees are there against rapid radicalisation
when it is obvious that it is the Sweden Democrats who dictate politics.
Last year, Jimmie Åkesson explained how he envisioned the return migration policy
in practice: "I do not rule out that in some cases it could be about
you also look for people who haven't found their place in Sweden."That amounts
with Swedish citizens would feel deeply offended, afraid and direct
threatened to be welcomed by Åkesson. “I don't have a problem if there is pressure
on people who have not established themselves here, who are not part of Sweden, who
lives segregated in a suburb," he explains (DN 19 March -21). The new return migration policy
must also be put in connection with other proposed measures, not least
regarding the "internal alien control". Ten years ago it met
the so-called Reva project, with the goal of streamlining the rejection of asylum seekers
which received rejection decisions, by strong protests against what many experienced as
deeply offensive personal controls. The Tidö agreement will not only restore
this policy, without also significantly turning up the volume. The police are suggested to get it right
to require identification with “consideration of circumstances such as experiential
leads to the detection of more unauthorized persons". It is almost Orwellian
euphemism for the very racial profiling that the Reva project was criticized for.
The police are also proposed to have expanded opportunities to "take care of and empty digital
media, body search [and] examination of baggage". Furthermore, the opportunity shall
to DNA samples are investigated. In addition, an inquiry must "investigate and propose constitutional amendments
on extended powers for the Police Authority in internal immigration control
to, for example, take care of people who cannot prove their identity and permit
stay in Sweden probable". All Swedish citizens who are not
sufficiently light-skinned therefore risk being stopped by police who have the authority
to conduct a body search on the spot, go through your mobile phone and computer, as well as top up
the inside of your mouth for a dna test. Have you also happened to forget your ID documents?
the police have the right to immediately detain you pending "full
investigation". It is hard not to see the abuses of personal freedom
which the new government constellation opens up for. A large part of the Swedish people
will feel both vulnerable and directly harassed by our authorities.
That this is precisely the goal is something that Åkesson openly admits. By doing
the “harder to access the social security systems” and with “more internal
alien controls" we want to create a system that contributes to "people
to a greater degree will want to return," Åkesson sums up. That the new government
chooses to make Sweden Democratic politics his shows how quickly
and mainstream liberals, Christian Democrats and moderates have been radicalized.
Each country's political leadership, through its authorities, has a fundamental obligation
to defend and protect its population. The Swedish constitution is clear
stated that "public power must be exercised with respect for the equality of all men
value and for the freedom and dignity of the individual human being", especially as regards
to "secure the right to work, housing and education and work for social care
and security". Kristersson's rule will, if the policy is implemented, rather that
recall the darkest chapters in Sweden's history; of racial biological thinking
1920s. In 1923, the Lösdriveriutredningen, about the situation of the Roma in Sweden, left
its final report. The investigators claimed that an integration of the country's Roma
is not possible and that it is therefore necessary to "one way or another get the gypsies
out of the country". The problem was, from the investigators' point of view, that most Roma were
Swedish citizens, which meant that the state could not just throw them out
the proposed "solution" became eerily similar to the Tidö agreement. Then as now applied
that, via an active state power and its authorities, create the conditions for
a "voluntary" return." Since most of them are probably Swedish subjects
and in any case their citizenship in another country can hardly be proved, can
their disappearance from the country cannot be achieved in any other way than by so strong restrictions
be imposed on their freedom of movement, that they find compatible with their own advantage
to leave the country and emigrate to a country with more favorable conditions for them."
Almost to the day one hundred years after a Swedish government inquiry proposed state
sanctioned harassment of a group of Swedish citizens, with the objective
to get them to leave the country, Sweden has a government that basically proposes
the same policy. This is what Kristersson claims is a policy "for the whole of Sweden".
Almost to the day one hundred years after a Swedish government inquiry proposed state
sanctioned harassment of a group of Swedish citizens, with the objective
to get them to leave the country, Sweden has a government that basically proposes
same policy"



New research from Delmi on immigration and integration
Lysekilsposten, 2022

People's values ​​regarding immigration and integration influence their perceptions
about the effects of immigration, and vice versa. This shows a new report from
The Delegation for Migration Studies (Delmi).
Based on unique panel data collected in Sweden during the period 2016-2019
Professor Anders Westholm, on behalf of Delmi, has studied perceptions of
the effects of immigration and the view on immigration and integration and how these affect
each other. The connections are also studied in the light of the impact that the social
the environment, feelings of belonging, trust, media use and political opinions
may have.Some conclusions:• People who spend a lot of time following news
about migration and integration and/or consider the area to be of great importance tend
to become more restrictive in their view of the extent of immigration, to make greater demands
on immigrants' adaptation to Swedish customs and practices and provide increased support for natives
rights before immigrated.• Feelings of belonging with people born
in the Middle East or Africa was found to lead to lower requirements for immigrants to
adapt to Swedish customs and practices in terms of child rearing and gender equality,
stronger support for immigrants' rights compared to natives as well
lower acceptance of discrimination against immigrants.• A high proportion of people with foreign
background in the social environment leads, according to the analysis, to lower requirements
on immigrants. The personal contact with people with a foreign background gives, however
opposite effect. Even self-placement on the political right scale tends to
lead to a more restrictive view of immigration. Anders Westholm is professor emeritus
in political science at Uppsala University.

Denmark is now hot in the Swedish migration debate.

For a long time it was only the Sweden Democrats who wanted an immigration policy in Danish
cut. Now many parties are looking across the strait for solutions in Swedish
segregation and crime development. Some like Anders Ygeman (S) speak openly about that
like Denmark, build away areas with a high proportion of non-Nordic immigrants. Others who
The Liberals' Johan Pehrson is ideologically close to the Danes when he proposes
compulsory language preschool for two-year-olds. It is clear that more and more Swedish politicians
want to see a policy of assimilation, just like in Denmark. But Sweden can
really take after Denmark and expect similar results? Looking at
statistics regarding migration and demography differ between Sweden and Denmark. The statistics
looks a little different in the two countries, but it should be uncontroversial
to argue that immigration and exclusion are much more extensive phenomena i
Sweden than in Denmark. According to the OECD, roughly 20 percent of Sweden's population is born
in another country. For Denmark, the corresponding figure is just over 10 percent - like Sweden
during the early 90s. In absolute terms, this is about two million people
in Sweden but only about 600,000 in Denmark. It also means that the Danish exclusion
is much smaller than the Swedish one. In the Danish designated residential areas there
"Ghetto laws" are now used no more than around 50,000 people live. In Sweden lives over
half a million people in vulnerable areas. Purely demographically, it would be Danish
the goal of having a maximum of 30 percent with non-Nordic ancestry in a residential area be
difficult to implement in Sweden. If you add up the groups born abroad with children
foreign parents make up over 30 percent of the total population.
In several age groups, the proportion is greater than 40 percent, which also applies in those
three metropolitan areas. One can ask the question whether Sweden has enough
large majority population to succeed in assimilation. The differences between Denmark
and Sweden will also continue to increase - and at an ever faster pace.
By the fact that Sweden has a much larger immigrant population from the start
we also see continued greater family and labor immigration. Immigrants to Sweden
last year more than 90,000 people. That is almost one sixth
of Denmark's total foreign-born population - in a single year. In Denmark there are as
also familiar with a political consensus that migration to the country should be minimized. IN
the Danish Social Democrats even have a zero vision of asylum immigration. Last
that year, roughly 600 people were granted asylum in Denmark. In Sweden, just over 7,000 got
asylum during the same time. Point by point the differences repeat themselves. Danish authorities
sets high demands for awarding Danish citizenship. As an example got
6,483 people received Danish citizenship in 2021. In the same year, more than 70
000 people Swedish citizenship. Sweden and Denmark today have completely different starting positions
for integration and the difference will increase. Danish politics will not come
easy to transfer in Sweden.

Integration Minister Anders Ygeman (S) seems to have released a so-called test balloon.
In an interview in DN, he opens up that Sweden should look at Danish politics
to demolish houses in deprived areas.

Ygeman believes that it is bad for residential areas where a majority of people live
has a "non-Nordic" background and refers to, among other things, long-term unemployment (DN
1/8).The outcome means that the Swedish Social Democrats will now go in Danish
direction and set much higher demands in migration policy? The answer is probably no.
The Danish tactic of demolishing areas of exclusion is only one part of a larger strategy
to reduce the impact that migration has on Danish society. The latest
years, for example, Denmark has only had between 1,000 and 2,000 asylum applications
a year. That is one tenth compared to Sweden. The current Danish Prime Minister
Mette Fredriksen (S) has even supported a vision of zero
asylum application and her government has worked to outsource asylum reception
to Rwanda in Africa. You can have opinions on that, but it shows the big one
the difference between Swedish and Danish social democrats. The difference goes back on
other policy areas that are closely linked to exclusion. Already in the 2015 election
for example, the Danish Social Democrats went to the polls on the slogan "Will you
you must work in Denmark". This then led to sharp dissociations from Swedish
Politician. The Swedish and Danish Social Democrats have developed in different ways
directions and it is difficult to imagine that Magdalena Andersson if she wins
the election would have support in the own movement to bring Sweden in the Danish direction. The ideal
on openness and increased diversity has become part of the Swedish social democracy
ideology. In Sweden, the social democratic governments have even after the record years
In 2015 and 2016, immigration to Sweden continued to be historically high.
Last year, for example, more than 90,000 people immigrated to Sweden. The difference
compared to before is that there are now fewer asylum seekers but more relatives of immigrants who
comes. Many of the relatives of the immigrants also move to those areas
their relatives already live. Although fewer seek asylum in Sweden, it therefore continues
the areas of exclusion to grow. If Anders Ygeman was serious about reducing
the concentration of non-Nordic immigrants, he had also had to look at them
which is added. And even if the Social Democrats would really swing in a more restrictive
line, it is still difficult to see how one in government would
be able to implement a more Danish policy. In the autumn, there will be an election on cooperation with
The Green Party, the Left Party and the Center Party. There are three parties that barely
have something in common except precisely that they want to maintain a high level of immigration and that
they like to brand criticism against migration and integration as racist. Therefore must
we assume that Ygeman's move is not about substantive politics but about attracting
back occasional marginal voters from the Sweden Democrats.


BORLÄNGE Young people in bulletproof vests who openly sell drugs in Tjärna center (there
I've spent thousands of hours playing, hanging out, pawning cans and skateboarding
as children).People who have lived in Sweden for almost 20 years who can't do more than occasional
word Swedish. Parents who have taken their children to a country that offers them protection
and financial security but discourages their children from spending time with their children
Swedes who welcomed them. Associations that happily accept money that is to go
to counteract segregation but who do not have the capacity or even the intention to
increase integration. That is not the whole picture of Tjärna Ängar, we all know that
have many friends and contact with serious leaders and associations in the area. Me
who works in a school where most of the children come from Tjärna Ängar, Jax and Bullermyren
and has immigrant parents and is active in politics meets so many
stars. Young and old who, regardless of difficulties with language and work, are constantly kneading
on for integration, cohesion and understanding. People who understand that
integration is a mutual process and nothing that "society" owes the individual.
I meet parents who raise their children with great care and gratitude
over the welfare system that gives all children, not just one, but several chances
to get an education and reach their goals. I see how a young generation often pulls
completely different conclusions than their parents about how one should live one's life to reach
success in the new country and makes brilliant results. I see children to parents
who cannot even read and write in their mother tongue go straight to Soltorgsgymnasiet
with top marks. I meet kids who already organize themselves against crime in junior high school
and for equality. But I also see the other picture. Far too many
young people clapping through. Young guys, but also girls, who give up and choose
wrong way. Parents, not least fathers, who live in such a way that every child
who passes school is a miracle. Not infrequently with several large litters of children and
all the responsibility dumped on mothers who struggle but can't possibly do enough. Many children grow
up under such conditions that the effort they need to make to have one
chance to succeed as well as other kids is almost inhuman. The different pictures
of Tjärna Ängar do not stand in opposition to each other. But when I started getting involved
me politically in Borlänge, I noticed a tendency to strongly favor one image
or the other. As usual, there are always those who only hear about it
negative. They are the ones who have often failed to connect with people themselves
who came to our country and only read the news.But in my own party and
in others, in association life and in municipal work, it has sometimes been the other way around
if - the really hard problems have not been clearly described. Serious actors
with great power and ability that swept problems under the carpet. I think about something that
that problem is bigger than the first. To save, insecure and lonely paints black
can only be remedied if the many, safe and powerful show that the problems
can be solved. That it would have actually benefited someone from the Social Democrats' side
doubts about what the flawed systems for migration policy would lead to
to, I don't think so. The whole reason why S-municipalities such as Borlänge and Södertälje
sounded the alarm and demanded that EBO be abolished already at the beginning of the 2000s was
that they were afraid of what a skewed responsibility for refugee reception together
with loosened rules for labor immigration and low-wage competition from
poorer EU countries would have effects in working-class municipalities with vacant tenancies.
This was at a time when business called the unions racist
and bourgeois parties wrote debate articles about Sweden needing "more Chinatowns"
and there was a lack of a majority in the Riksdag for more municipalities to help
to. But even in my own party there were many who turned a blind eye to that segregation
we saw began to emerge in suburbs and working towns. The laborers fought
long together with S-tälje and Malmö in a headwind. Today it would be naive to believe that
the integration problems are quickly resolved without help from the state level. Financing
to renovate the million programs, rule changes in the Social Services Act,
a government and well-financed labor market policy, to be constantly updated
the regulatory framework for migration, right now most urgently stop all labor immigration
to jobs without long education requirements. One of the fastest answers to the injustice
the burden of responsibility for the integration that I heard is the proposal that we in the Social Democrats
in Borlänge produced: that the state immediately takes over the costs of the welfare support.
A proposal that would cost eleven billion but free up a lot
money for schools and social services in the municipalities that have major integration problems.
But it is probably also true that Borlänge could have gone further in the integration work
if more actors managed to describe the whole picture of our socio-economic
vulnerable areas. With a lack of knowledge, analysis and courage, they have political and social
the measures have simply not been good enough. Long before Magdalena Andersson
said we should say it like it is and do what it takes I repeated that it
nothing can be done about problems that are not talked about. Knowledge is the way forward
in all constructive discussions. When you feel great frustration about things
condition, it is easy to slip into anger and helplessness. That a city is like that
segregated and the living conditions so different also create prejudices and fears. But that
being part of a political context where you try to solve problems together helps
actually against impotence. Through politics you get in touch with people of all kinds
parts of town and it's a great way to get to know people with different experiences
and other living conditions. It creates friendships and contacts and knowledge that
can be used to develop our city and it is a meaningful way to channel
frustration and anger.These days when talking about failed integration projects
so I know a truth: The political parties, in second place behind
the superior one sports movement, are those who do incomparably the most to people
in our city should meet and get to know each other. Do you feel pissed off, frustrated
or worried after watching Mission review yesterday? Good. Join
a political party. Or sign up as a coach in a sports club. Don't do it
if you don't already have plenty of time to support your own kids on their wobbly path
through Borlänge towards adulthood. But if you have time to spare after reading your homework
with your own children and trained others, it would be very nice if you wanted to be
with us and work so that more children throughout Borlänge feel hope and faith in the future.
(THE TEXT WAS ORIGINALLY PUBLISHED ON ERIK NISE'S FACEBOOK PAGE)"The political
the parties, in second place behind the superior first sports movement, are those who
does incomparably the most for people in our city to meet and get to know each other."


Good integration reduces problems with migration
Östgöta Correspondent, 2021

DEBATE
Some time ago, "Rådvill" wondered on Corren's submission page about the choice between MP's climate policy
and SD's migration policy.

Although the choice is obvious to me, I have been thinking about whether there are good answers
for "Rådvill". To begin with, I think it makes a big difference if we see
on migration and integration as two different issues. Migration is about people
whose lives are threatened in conflicts, wars and oppressive regimes. How to meet
we them when they leave their homes, their loved ones, their jobs and run away?Integration
is about ensuring that those who have moved to Sweden have good opportunities to come
into society. Learn Swedish, learn a profession or supplement previously
skills with those that are needed right here. Get into association life. All for
to be able to contribute and participate, work, study and help their children with school and leisure interests.
Sweden today has a crying need for labor in many occupations,
from healthcare to property management, transport and industry. The better
we stay on integration, the better it will be for our companies. All
also points to the fact that it is better for the children at school when the parents work. Sweden Democrats
in Linköping has in recent years consistently voted no to all
proposals that improve integration. Whether it is about access to housing,
vocational training in combination with SFI or more support for associations
who works with diversity, SD has voted no. I can only interpret it as
that SD does not care if immigrants get a job or end up in exclusion.
In this way, we only increase insecurity and hopelessness in vulnerable neighborhoods.
The better we get at integration, the less the problems with migration, because
we can receive people in a good way and make use of their strengths. However
there is no one who wishes for increased migration. The best thing would be if people could
stay at home and live their lives in their home countries. Their skills are needed
where. Their relatives need them there. A strong climate policy is just one of many
tool to reduce refugee flows, but it is an important tool. Dry
and torrential rains lead to water and food shortages, driving people to flee.
So, for me the answer is that a strong climate policy and a strong integration policy
reduces the problems of migration. A hard migration policy, on the other hand, is not the solution
some of the problems we are already facing due to climate change
and increased exclusion.


"Löfven never retorted at me - until he was forced to"
Svenska Dagbladet, 2021

The attitude towards SD and migration has led to internal criticism and defections. CD:
s Ebba Busch is confident in the choice of path, but says that Swedish politics has become "heartless"
and that the let-go mentality and failed integration are behind the development of crime.
Ebba Busch can't find her phone. It seems to have been cleaned up in the general rush
which characterises the late summer days at the Christian Democrats' Riksdag office. The party leader
meets SvD in his office, where a pile of motions before the Riksdag in November
lies on the small desk she always stands at - there isn't even one
chair. She will read them all before the weekend. Then, after a working week, she will lead
a meeting with the party board to go through the motions. - We just found out
that we have a 13 day streak, which is scheduled. And so things can always happen
on that, says Ebba Busch. The political fall semester has started with a bang
and the government crisis of the summer already feels far away. The next political drama
can be the budget. Ebba Busch does not want to say if KD and M will present one
common budget.- We will return to how we do it. But according to the Moderates
the party will present its own budget, and may then come together
in the finance committee with other parties to bring down the government's budget. What is
best in this situation is to "look in slightly different ways", according to Ebba Busch. Several lots
need to support a budget, and there are "some conversations going on", she says. When asked
if one of the possible scenarios is a budget cooperation also with the Sweden Democrats
and the Liberals answer Ebba Busch that the alternative is an M-KD government
which has support from as many other parties as possible. - Then we have contacts with
different parties in different ways. She finds it all the easier to talk about the government's budget,
which will be presented on 20 September. Minister of Finance Magdalena Andersson presented
the framework, a reform space of 74 billion, in August. Without negotiating
with C and V, the government must present a budget that C and V support. - It will come
to be a budget strongly marked by buying support for government power
the last time until the election. But there is a very large scope for reform, which
you have the opportunity, so to speak, to buy different interests' support with, says Ebba
Busch. Her starting point is that the government's budget makes it through the Riksdag,
but is preparing for it not to.Is it desirable to take over government power
already this winter?- The best thing for a government alternative is always to have four
years on, a full term of office. But voters should be able to feel safe with
that if there is an opportunity to take over, we will take it. The day before the interview
the headlines are about four shootings in the Stockholm region during one night.
A man in his 20s died in Hjulsta. Ebba Busch thinks Swedish politics has
has become indifferent to shootings and other serious problems that she believes exist
in healthcare and rural areas.- I think that Swedish politics has in many ways become
heartless. They are now dealing with long care queues, almost daily shootings and
a despondent countryside as something natural. One is indifferent to it. What does it include
"Swedish politics", is it other politicians and parties? - Yes, but I think
also that we as a movement must challenge ourselves. It has been 242 days today and
we have had 195 shootings so far this year. Where are the cries in the streets? She picks up
that women are murdered by men they have or have had a relationship with and that mothers
forced to bury their children. - If our raison d'être is to stand up for them
most vulnerable, we must dare to take really tough measures against those who violate human dignity
most. But the point of criticism is not directed at the own movement. - I mean that it
the fact that, after so many years in government, no more has been done, no
dare to propose more measures, it is because people have become indifferent to these
very serious problems. It is assumed that you can count this as
everyday life. It becomes heartless in practice and that is how it lands with many voters.
A report from the Crime Prevention Council in August showed that foreign-born
and those who have immigrant parents - but were born in Sweden - are overrepresented
among those suspected of crimes in Sweden. According to Ebba Busch, the overrepresentation is due
on failed integration.- It has nothing to do with a person's
skin color whether one commits a crime or not. But what you hear about Sweden and
what is allowed and not in practice, it is clear that it makes a difference. We have
had both a migration and integration policy and crime fighting that signalled
that it is okay to commit crime of contribution, to commit rape, assault and murder
when you come here for example. How are signals sent out that it is okay to
abuse and murder?- For example, that you can commit a serious sexual crime
towards a child and still roam freely in the streets waiting for a vacant seat
on a prison because it is full.- It is clear that it signals a song
go mentality which is very serious. Summon the heartless. In that case, it should
those signals go to everyone in Sweden and not just those who are immigrants or
children of immigrants? - Well, those signals go to everyone. But we have people born abroad
who do everything to do right for themselves and become part of Swedish society.
Who are deported because of pettiness, and we have convicted rapists who are allowed to
stay. It is clear that it also affects how you behave as a newcomer
to Sweden and what driving forces it sets in motion. But it has nothing to do with ethnicity
to do. Ebba Busch wants her party to take after the sister party in Germany,
and become wider. She says that the Christian Democrats are different from everyone else
other parties in Sweden in that the tradition of ideas and ideology is value-driven
- law enforcement, migration and healthcare, where they have something in common with SD.
- At the same time, I have no problem with being crystal clear with "the criticism that
I have towards oneness rather than system-oriented. But at the same time, Ebba Busch has received internal
criticism that deals with the party's orientation and approach to the Sweden Democrats.
In a debate article in SvD, Riksdag member Lars Adaktusson wrote that KD does not
should form a political bloc with SD, and pointed out, among other things, that the party's
ideological basis "not [is] compatible with narrow nationalism and a political thinking
where self-interest is paramount solidarity with the most vulnerable."Ebba Busch
says the party "by and large" is fully on board with her line. If an M-KD government does not
get at least 50 percent, they will have to settle with other parties, points out
she. There are substantive issues and areas, such as separate Sweden Democrats and that we
are two completely different parties with completely different ideological basis. Which questions you don't
can compromise around can become stumbling blocks if an M-KD government requires support from
SD?- We don't know what challenges Sweden will have. You can look back
in the four years that have been with the migration crisis, acts of terrorism and a pandemic. But we
will navigate based on our values ​​and we will not use violence
on them. Lars Adaktusson has announced that he will not stand in the 2022 parliamentary election.
In the past, wrote Mattias Ingesson, who has been a substitute in the Riksdag and sits
in the regional board in Jönköping, on Facebook that he will not stand for
new assignments for the party."I simply do not believe in the right-wing conservative project
which the party leadership runs with a great focus on criticism of migration and tough measures
against crime," he writes. As early as 2016, pastor Daniel Berner left the party,
because he believed that the direction on the migration issue was wrong. Now he will be a municipal councillor
in Vetlanda for the Center Party. In May, Knut Isaksson left Dorotea KD at
because of the SD collaboration. Are you worried about the defections and the criticism?- I think so
it is natural in all parties that some come and some go. I feel safe
in the development that has taken place in the party in recent years. We are more combative,
but we are for soft values, says Ebba Busch. Opinion-wise successes can
lie behind some of the internal criticism, she believes. In August 2017, KD received 3.7
percent of voter support in SvD/Sifo, in August this year the party landed at 4.9.- For
four years ago with one year left until the election we were calculated, today you count
U.S. Bourgeois voters count on us as a decisive part of a future government.
Our opponents are counting on us and therefore they paint us much harder.
I understand that some members find it difficult, but it is basically something
positive. She says that four years ago KD was ignored, not least
in Riksdag debates. - Stefan Löfven never took me back. Until he was forced to
blame me, because the voters gave us that support. Series One year until the election
here is the fifth part in SvD's interview series with all party leaders. Facts
Five quick questions for Ebba Busch What do you want to change? Care. It is so undignified
Sweden that sick people wait for months and even years to receive care.
If our neighbouring countries could solve these problems, how can it be so impossible
here? What is your worst quality? An almost maniacal desire to improve. At large
and small. What is the funnest thing you know? When you manage to solve difficult problems! And when
like Madicken, you "can feel life itself". I do that in the forest, when I can
grow. And bathe. What are you tired of? All the time spent on trifles and politics
many times am so anxious that the important things don't get done. Who is the best? Min
son Birger, who handled a nervous start to school with flying colours. I'm proud so me
could crack how he finds his way in life. SvD"Man now treats long care queues,
almost daily shootings and a despondent countryside as something natural.""
Four years ago with one year left until the election we were counted, today we are counting
man with us."

Löfven critical: The Left Party must answer how they see SD
Swedish Daily, 2021

It is time for the reluctant politician to sum up his legacy. Waiting for a left turn
when the metal worker leaves the post of party leader for the Social Democrats? "That
with us being right-wing: I don't buy it," says Stefan Löfven in his first major
interview after the notice of resignation.

It's drizzling at Harpsund. The Prime Minister, dressed in a checkered shirt and loafers,
walks along the gravel paths and points. On the left the small sandy beach like Carl
Formed landscaped. To the right, the wooden house where the old Harpsundsekan is preserved, the
in which Nikita Khrushchev and Tage Erlander rowed in the sixties. - You would see
a sunny day when you stand on the terrace and look out. It's done so well. you feel
harmony, even inside the house. But it's not luxurious and extravagant so that you
becomes uncomfortable, but you feel that here I feel good, he says. The bellowing of the cows echoes
across the water from the meadows on the other side of the lake. There is a heavy scent of lavender
over the courtyard. All week the media has been buzzing with speculation about who
who will succeed Stefan Löfven when he leaves in November. They are here, all of them. Magdalena
Andersson, Mikael Damberg, Lena Hallengren, Anders Ygeman, Ardalan Shekarabi,
Tomas Eneroth and all the other ministers mentioned. On Thursday night ate
they crayfish and bathed from the jetty below the new rose plantation.- Four hundred
new roses have been planted. And then all the lavender in front. There will be a lot of butterflies,
says Löfven. The recent social democratic party leadership elections have been long
from idyllic. But Stefan Löfven doesn't think there will be any turbulence
battles this autumn.- I can never guarantee anything. But I think we
have stability in the party and that we can handle this. It is ultimately up to
ourselves. I have told the party that. It is up to us to handle it
here. We all have to take responsibility to make sure we can make it. The government has
been to Harpsund for the traditional budget deliberations. A complicating one
factor is that the January collaboration has broken up. The government presents its own budget,
but is dependent on both the Center Party and the Left Party departing from practice
and votes on the government's budget, while Annie Lööf's condition is that the budget
cannot negotiate with the Left Party. When Finance Minister Magdalena Andersson
reviewed the financial situation and presented the budget space - 74 billion
- at a press conference here from Harpsund on Thursday afternoon, she told
that she still holds talks with both the Center Party and the Left Party, even if they don't
sitting around some joint negotiation table. Exactly at the same time as Magdalena
Andersson held his press conference, Jonas Sjöstedt had a release party for his new book "Allt
will be good" at Nedre Manilla at Djurgården in Stockholm. Stefan Löfven,
writes Sjöstedt in his memoirs, wanted to cooperate with the center parties of political
reasons, not only because of the parliamentary situation. The former left-wing leader
has spent the week explaining his disappointment in front of Stefan in interviews
Löfven as a politician. In Manilla, Sjöstedt elaborated what he means:- When we proposed
left-wing policies such as tax increases or proposing a ban on profit
in welfare, we hit the wall hard. There were points that had prevented that
open the door to the right. It was clear that Löfven would much rather cooperate
with the Center Party and the Liberals. In a way, it is consistent that he to
and co-wrote the humiliation clause into the January agreement. That was the long term
the goal to get into such a position, he said. At Harpsund the next day is Stefan
Löfven noticeably annoyed that his former party leader. Which is your worst
characteristic? It's hard to answer that straight away but if you were to ask Ulla
she would probably say that she thinks I get too involved when I watch
sports. Once one of the bodyguards came running and wondered what had happened
because he had heard me shout. But it was only Tottenham who had scored.
colleague has written about their conversation. - I haven't even read Sjöstedt's book and I
absolutely do not want to comment on anything that is said in conversations between us, he says.
- I think Sjöstedt forgets that we did a lot together too. We have
rescheduled the welfare investments. We have reduced the tax for pensioners. I can hold
in a long time. That he is now bringing forward that we are right-wing, no, this is very good social democratic
policy. Then to get it through, yes, we have to compromise.
Did you take the Left Party's support for granted? - No, not for granted. But I could not
dream that the Left Party would request help from the Sweden Democrats in order to
bring down a social democratic government. That surprised me. How do you feel about it
today?- I think the Left Party must answer how they see the Sweden Democrats.
The Center Party takes a very clear position against giving SD influence, precisely
as we. But the Left Party thinks it's okay. It is extremely strange.
Splitting the Alliance has been a successful strategy to secure social democracy
power, even if Stefan Löfven himself does not say that is the reason
to the fact that he wanted to cooperate with the right. - I have always thought that bloc politics is
dumbfounding. It cannot be that we have eight parties in the Riksdag, but that
there are only two ways to get a government together. I certainly don't think the voters want it
that we should be so paralysed by action. More than Jonas Sjöstedt are dissatisfied with it
political orientation that has existed in the January agreement. In May, SVT conducted a survey
with social democratic municipal councillors who showed that they wanted to introduce profit bans
in welfare, reintroduce the welfare tax and raise several other taxes. Half thought
that the January agreement had negatively affected the Social Democrats. Nevertheless, the municipal councillors wanted
continue to cooperate with the Center Party."Give up, you will never change
Annie Lööf", wrote the editorial writer and the prime minister's former speechwriter Daniel
Swedin in the newspaper Arbetet då. Ahead of the congress this fall, demands are now being heard from various
hold in the Social Democratic Party that you should go left in the economic sphere
the policy. Several districts have proposals for reintroduced property tax, increased
capital taxes and scrapped route deductions, among other things. In the spring, a working group proposed
under the leadership of Magdalena Andersson, among other things, a millionaire's tax and increased tax
on ISK savings. Proposals that were rejected by the Center Party. And this week the youth association demanded
SSU's new chairman Lisa Nåbo in Expressen that the government puts
put forward a budget that does not take into account the Center Party but shows classic social democratic
politics. What has the cooperation with the center parties done to the Social Democrats,
has it pulled you to the right?- We continue to spend big money on
welfare. Now a budget will be presented that is extremely strong. So the thing about that
we are right: I don't buy it. What are we going in with? Jobs, climate change,
welfare and security, i.e. fighting crime. To me it is
very good social democratic politics. But of course it is so, again, that
as long as I don't have 51 percent, I have to find cooperation.Would you like to
Will the Social Democrats resume cooperation with the Center Party after the next election?-
We will go to elections ourselves, all parties will do that. It is important to
make it clear: this is our party, this is what we stand for. But then we are ready
to take responsibility so that the country can be governed. How it turns out after the election, it has to
that election results show. That was my point when I took office
party chairman. We can't create new blocks now, then we're back in the same situation
again. What legacy does Stefan Löfve actually leave behind? He himself is unwilling
to sum up, because he will be Prime Minister for another two months.
One issue that has been difficult for the government is crime and gang crime.
This week, the Crime Prevention Council's report came out, which showed, among other things, that young
with two immigrant parents are overrepresented among those suspected of
crime.- This is why integration is so incredibly important. That is why when we
talking about crime, we have what I call the tougher side. It is
better laws, stricter tools for the police and so on and we have worked on that
successively with. We must have the other side next to: schooling and housing.Stefan
Löfven measures a meter above the floor with his hand. - I will never forget when I hit
a little girl this size in Uppsala. There were a lot of people
and she approached me and said: Can you help us, we need a bigger apartment.
It is clear that then I think: When she comes home and has to do her homework, how will it be
then that for her? Probably not so good. All that is connected. Although
Stefan Löfven has been prime minister for two terms and his party has
ruled Sweden for long periods before that, he believes that the problems we see in
day can mainly be explained by the Alliance's policy. - Look at what was done in Stockholm
outlying areas perhaps ten years ago. Social services were cut back there.
It was a saving. Taxes were lowered and social services were cut.
Then something happened. That is why we say that we must have a society that is
strong. You have to watch your parents go to work. We must invest right in the school
so that gang crime does not attract crime in a completely different way than for
a few years ago. Do we risk an entire generation growing up and being seen as a burden
of society?- We must be clear that Swedish law applies in Sweden, regardless
who are you. If you were born here generations back or if your parents
have arrived here. Everyone must be equal before the law. But then we have to, of course
inform about how the law works in Sweden. It sounds simple, why is it
where are we then?- It's not easy and it's because we also had another
political direction in our country. And it is important to talk about this. It is
Sure, I'm a social democrat, I believe in our politics of course.Stefan Löfven
was long reluctant to draw parallels between migration and crime. In SVT:
s Agenda 2019, he firmly said no to the question of whether migration affected. The year after changed
he himself and said that Sweden's high immigration has led to poorer integration
and increased crime and that the government therefore changed the migration policy.I
the political debate, immigrants are connected with - It is also an over-representation
among the unemployed of those who were not born in Sweden or whose parents
are not born in Sweden. Then it is easy to lose hope and faith in society.
I can't earn my own living, I can't make any efforts for
society. Work is one. Duty and right. You are allowed to do your duty but then can
you also demand your right. It is an honorable work ethic that I stand for.
It took persuasion for Stefan Löfven to become IF Metall's chairman
party leader almost ten years ago. He was singled out by the party's executive committee
to save the Social Democrats from the worst opinion crisis ever. Not
because he was directly considered able to attract voters, but because he was seen as right
person to calm down the internal fighting that had flared up in the party during both
Håkan Juholt's and Mona Sahlin's time as party leaders. The last evening, before he
had made up his mind, he walked from the meeting with the Social Democrats' executive
committee at the party headquarters on Sveavägen away to his apartment on
Norrmalm. LO chairman Wanja Lundby-Wedin would go in the same direction. They discussed
the difference between being a trade union leader and a political leader. Today, ten years later,
has he arrived at an answer. - As a union representative, when the collective bargaining movement
is over, it is common to sit with the other party and talk about how to
must cooperate to solve the daily problems. Training for industrial workers,
energy issues and everything that it can be. In politics, says Stefan Löfven, must
one must be more on one's guard.- All parties must in every given second maximize their
own benefit. It is also becoming more common depending on social media and the short-term
in our society in general. Then it might be easier to pat someone
- figuratively speaking of course - and take a fight rather than looking a little more long-term
and think about whether you can build something together that also carries. That difference
I see enough.Stefan Löfven throughout his party leadership has been seen as that
unwilling politician. When he announced his resignation exactly one week ago, Dr
several political commentators also concluded that his political project has
been unclear. A master at getting through crises - parliamentary as well
external events - and which always managed to stay put. But more than that? What has he
really wanted as a politician? When Stefan Löfven hears that reasoning, he smiles
he resigned in a way that makes him look like he wants to retire
at once.- We must strengthen the community. It is an interaction between collectives
and individual. I actually think it is best described in our party programme: Free,
equal individuals in a solidarity society, that is what the democratic is
the goal of socialism and that is my goal. It doesn't get more concrete than that
so with Stefan Löfven.- It is precisely this change of direction that we actually
has made. It is not just welfare, but we have changed the direction of Swedish
defence, it was something completely different when we took office. We have received the security questions,
it is also a social democratic value. Free and equal individuals
in a society of solidarity. 5 quick facts with Stefan Löfven What do you want to change?
As a social democrat, it is important to me to build a stronger and safer society
society for all, with strong welfare given according to need and not according to wallet,
with reduced class differences, more jobs and increased pace of climate change.
What is the funniest thing you know? When I see concrete examples of how our policy is improving
people's everyday life. And I really enjoy reading, watching football
and take forest walks with Ulla. What are you tired of?I can think it is
a bit tiring when very complex issues and trade-offs are simplified to such an extent
that everything appears as black or white. That's not what life looks like and that's not how it looks
political processes out. Who is the best? Ulla. 24.1 percent in voter support got S in SvD/Sifos
augustimätning.SvD.se Few mourn the departure, but everyone is surprised by the Social Democrats
wants to the left - but only has right-wing candidates to choose from. Stefan Löfvens
resignation makes it easier for the establishment to maintain its grip on the party,
writes SvD's Torbjörn Nilsson. (The text can also be read in Friday's newspaper.One year to the election Party leader interview. This is the second part in SvD's interview series
with all party leaders with a year left until the election - and ahead of an eventful one
political autumn. In yesterday's newspaper, you could read the interview with the Center leader
Annie Lööf."I have always thought that block politics is stupid. It can
not be that we have eight parties in the Riksdag but there are only two ways to
get a government together."Stefan Löfven"Free, equal individuals in a solidary society,
that is the goal of democratic socialism and that is what it is
my goal."Stefan Löfven, about his vision of what a society should look like.

Caption: "I could not dream that the Left Party would request help from the Sweden Democrats
to bring down a social democratic government," says Prime Minister Stefan
The leaves (S).  One year until the election | Stefan Löfven disagrees with the former Left Party leader
Jonas Sjöstedt's criticism that the Social Democrats have become a right-wing party
under Löfven's leadership. | Stefan Löfven claims that the politics from the alliance years
bears a large part of the blame for the now growing crime rate. | Stefan Löfven
departs in connection with the S party congress at the beginning of November.

What do our local politicians want? We had all parties in the municipal council respond
five questions before the election in 2022. Here are the results.

1. What will be the next election's most important issue? 2. Do you want to change the tax? 3. How do you want
you promote entrepreneurship? 4. What efforts do you want to make for cultural life? 5. What
do you want to do for integration? THE MODERATORS:1. Undoubtedly "order and order".
Both in the economy, as well as in school and on the streets and squares. Unfortunately, consequences are often missing
and it only benefits criminals and affects ordinary decent people.
2. The tax should be as low as possible, at the same time as the important municipal core activities
receives the resources needed to maintain good quality. The tax would
can be lowered slightly.3. The good business climate in Staffanstorp has benefited many
new establishments and jobs. The municipality's work with quick notifications, pleasant treatment
and responsiveness shall continue.4. Cultural activities must be characterised by quality, freedom of choice
and reasonable resources.5. Both the Swedish language and Swedish values
are necessary for the integration. Contributions to new arrivals need to be reduced. A refugee stop
is needed for society to be able to integrate those who have arrived. Those who don't
who want to be integrated must return to their home countries via repatriation programs.
 THE SOCIAL DEMOCRATS: 1. Security through high quality in care for the elderly, school and preschool,
but also through a rich range of leisure activities. Security is also true freedom of choice
requires the possibility of choosing a municipal alternative where every kroner is used in the business.
Security is also created with a varied range of housing. We want to build at least
300 rental apartments during the next mandate period.2. Thanks to the government and the supporting parties
the municipality has received a supplement which means that today we see no need for change
tax.3. Increased security and reduced crime benefit the entrepreneurs, as well
better mobile networks and broadband as well as smooth handling of the businessmen's cases.4.
Develop the music school into a cultural school, increase support for cultural activities. More cultural activities
at school.5. Prioritise initiatives for Swedish education. It promotes
integration and work. Foreign education, work experience and language skills
must be able to be validated and credited. THE LIBERALS: 1. What society we
want in Staffanstorp after the pandemic. Staffanstorp does a lot of good, but we want
that the municipality works more with preventive efforts, with student health, the school, with
Pilegården and Trivselpunkten for the elderly and with influence and democracy. 2.
We are not afraid to lower or raise. The primary thing is that every tax kroner
used well.3. Good local business climate and keep going
the road. Better cooperation between the labor market unit and business. Workplaces
per exploited square meter. Employment is primary.4. Support non-profits
the associations and annual identity-building cultural events.5. Using civil society
and support the associations that help develop Staffanstorp. Right conditions
and high demands. Our citizens must want to contribute to Staffanstorp's development.
THE CHRISTIAN DEMOCRATS:1. School and education. Strengthened student health, students who
feel good learn better. We also need to reduce the size of the children's groups, too big
groups can expose children to stress that can have serious consequences for them
development.2. Nothing, further increased taxes will inhibit employment
and the growth.3. Work for low thresholds to start a business, low fees
or none, reduced bureaucracy, simpler rules. Introduce service guarantees with
specified deadlines and compensation to the entrepreneur when the municipality does not comply
to the warranty.4. The music check system is to be developed into a culture check, more open
library and strengthened opportunities for people with disabilities to have
access to cultural offerings and being able to be active themselves.5. That from the first
that day, an asylum program begins with mandatory SFI studies and community orientation.
Get people to work.THE ENVIRONMENTAL PARTY: 1. Security and hope for the future. We have to
have courage and action. The struggle for the agricultural land becomes central - the unsustainable
the expansion takes place at the expense of future food supply and service level.
2. Financial restructuring with increased revenue is required in the long term. Today we have increasing loan debts,
delayed service and older population. Right now no increase.3. Green
industries, digital innovation. We believe in the driving force of our villages and urban areas,
not least modern eco-farming with a good harvest, reduced climate impact and healthier
water.4. More commitment to a revived cultural night and youth culture. Support
to culture in the villages, for increased vitality and community.5. Show willingness, cooperate
wide, close the campsite. This is how we change!THE CENTER PARTY:1. Bet on green
growth. Agriculture is an important piece of the puzzle in the transition to a green and
sustainable society. The municipality's location on the fertile plain means that we can
become a leader in food production.2. We strive for a safe and good environment for learning
in school, high quality in health care. To achieve these goals and about the financial
development requires it, there may be a minor tax increase. 3. Ensure
that it will be cheaper for small business owners to hire. Make it easy for businesses to
create jobs. Fully developed broadband throughout the municipality. 4. Support association life, both
in culture and sports. Provide good premises. 5. Facilitate getting training
and/or jobs to become self-sufficient. SWEDEN DEMOCRATS:1. We want
prioritise a safe society at every level. The insecurity has been created by political
decisions that we opposed.2. We must be careful with the citizens' money. Provided
that the core operations also continue to show improved quality, the tax should
be lowered.3. The municipality has a top ranking regarding business climate. We keep coming
to welcome new companies and protect existing ones.4. We want to offer a rich
association life for children and young people. Our equestrian association must be able to be run and developed.
We would like to see a historically inspired residential area established in
connection to Uppåkra, and that the archaeological center is developed.5. A successful one
integration presupposes strict migration. The individual has a very large own
responsibility. THE LEFT PARTY:1. Everyone must have the right to housing with reasonable rent - more
rental apartments, including in Hjärup. The school has too few resources - students
do not get the help they need and several schools are in poor condition. It is also needed
more leisure activities with a wider range of sports. Bet on Hjärup: equip yourself
sports field, get shops, pharmacies and regular public transport to Staffanstorp.
2. The municipal tax is comparatively low and needs to be increased in order for us to
afford the necessary interventions. A tax increase must be linked to a decision on
improved operations.3. Primarily because the municipality's operations are so good
that Staffanstorp is an attractive municipality to live, work and go to school in. 4. We want
see a theater in Staffanstorp.5. The most important thing is that immigrants like others
have access to housing, education, care and culture and of high quality with
opportunity for participation. All discrimination must be fought.


"Every bullet a new tear in the social contract"
Affärsvärlden, 2021.

The government has two choices: Either stop making a fool of itself with pubertal expressions of force
and instead start acting. Or step aside and hand over to someone
who want and can reverse the trend. It is enough to glance at Denmark for inspiration.


It's so horrible. It says in the papers that two children have been shot - and they are mine
children" (Expressen 18/7). How do you defend yourself against those words? Just the thought that mine
two small children could be shot in the legs, in the playground, near ours
apartment, a hot summer evening, makes me faint. For the mother in another family,
living in Visättra, it is no longer just a dizzying thought. For her it is
nowadays harsh reality. I suffer with the mothers who have to comfort their toddlers who
seen peers bleed. I suffer with the parents who are supposed to instill hope at the same time
which they themselves fear. I suffer with the five-year-old and the six-year-old like last fall,
when asked how the summer holidays were, will tell about the panic and pain when the bullets
met.I suffer with all well-behaved and law-abiding people who moved here in the belief that
they should be offered freedom and security, but who instead are forced to live in fear
Also here. I suffer with those who are forced to stay in these lawless areas without opportunity
to move from there. I suffer with all those who suffer doubly; partly as
crime victims, partly when their residential areas are stigmatised because of a minority
with great capital of violence. I suffer with everyone who in the darkness is torn apart by anxiety
faced with the thought that it could be their child who happens to be in the wrong playground,
at the wrong time, next time. DESTINATION NORMALITY I accuse you of being open
eyes closed, relativized and brown-stamped, while border after border was crossed
towards destination normlessness. I accuse you who laid the foundation for this social development,
as well as those of you who have made a criminal policy on par with yours impossible
failure. I accuse the middle class who, from a reasonable distance, talked about openness
and humanity, but who would never risk the safety of their own children
by settling in these areas. I accuse you of ignoring the connection
between migration and integration, where the latter is a prerequisite for the former.
I accuse you of the state's eroded monopoly of violence, of the new class society
where the alienation of the immigrant lower class is inherited. I accuse you of
the seventy-second time cries out on Twitter, which wallows you in bombastic formulations
about how unacceptable it all is, despite the fact that you are the ones who had the real one
the power to end the violence. I accuse you who year after year worried you more
for the image of reality than for reality itself. It is thanks to you who
more and more innocent people - directly and indirectly - are affected by the senseless violence.
For every bullet, no matter who it hits, another tear occurs in that social contract
woven of the frailest of threads. The escalating violence is nobody
natural disaster, no coincidence, it's not bad luck, it's not even a law of nature.
The escalating violence is a consequence of political decisions and only political decisions
will overcome the problem. Yet - despite all the words - the political is missing
the will to get to the bottom of it.DANISH MODEL I can't shake the thought
that the will - to go from the politically difficult to the politically necessary
- would have been monumentally much bigger if the gunshot children had played in
a sandbox in Östermalm, if they had been the children of an influential person,
perhaps a minister or a director general, with networks and contacts. I can
don't get rid of the idea that despite all the solemn words about all people's
equal value in the end, yet there is a difference between people and people. But all that
there is secondary now. In practice, the Prime Minister and his cabinet have two choices;
either stop making a fool of yourself with pubertal expressions of force and start instead
act - or step aside and hand over to someone else who is willing and able
reverse the trend. It's enough to glance at Denmark for inspiration. How long
the neighbouring country a warning example in terms of gang crime. Today, the roles are reversed
and Denmark has fewer gang members than Stockholm County. The positive development
connected with concrete measures against criminals, such as visitation zones,
doubled prison sentences for violent crimes in connection with gang-related conflicts,
as well as bans on convicted gang members from, for up to ten years after serving
punishment, stay in certain places. At the latest in just over a year there will be parliamentary elections. The
parties that manage to formulate a policy that pushes back the gangs and that recreates
order and order will win the security election in 2022. Therefore, the bourgeois should
the opposition put together a package of measures à la the Danish model with a focus on
an overhaul of the criminal justice complex. Within the framework of such a package would
a reduced sentence for Crown witnesses can be introduced, possibility to under certain conditions
testify anonymously, a lowering of the age of criminal responsibility, criminalisation
of organisation in gangs, raising the minimum sentence, and abolishing both
the youth and quantity discount, like the parole."It's so terrible.
It says in the papers that two children have been shot - and they are my children". Mom's
words cannot be defended against. It shouldn't have been anyone's child, I want
call out. l Independent political commentator. Previously i.a. head editorial staff GP."
I accuse you of ignoring the connection between migration and integration, there
the latter is a prerequisite for the former. I accuse you of the state eroded
monopoly of violence, for the new class society where the alienation of the immigrant lower class
is inherited."

The role of language in integration cannot be ignored
TTELA, 2021

Integration
It is not easy for those who immigrate to Sweden to enter the labor market.
Contrary to what you might think, it is not easier if you have a qualified
education and long experience in a high-status profession.

In a recently published study, Nahikari Irastorza, PhD in migration studies,
and Pieter Bevelander, professor of international migration and ethnic relations
at Malmö University, compared four million Swedish- and foreign-born individuals
between 25 and 60 years old, and looked more closely at their situation in the Swedish
the labor market. What emerges is, among other things, that Swedish-born people with low education
have a higher employment rate than immigrants with a university degree, and
who have lived in Sweden for over ten years. In addition, immigrants with a high school diploma have
lower unemployment than the highly educated with three or more years of university studies
in the luggage. Among those who arrived in connection with the latest wave of refugees,
from 2014 onwards, over half have post-secondary education, percentage wise
far more than in Sweden's population as a whole. It is basically something positive,
but it has also led to a lot of frustration when people who have come here with
a long and solid education and many years of work experience in their home country
cannot use this to earn a living and contribute to Sweden. The will of the Swedish
politicians and authorities to establish fast track, and simplify the possibilities
to validate knowledge and educational documents, is therefore fully understandable.
At the same time, one must not simplify the discussion about - and the solutions for - the unemployed
or overqualified immigrant graduates. All too often the question is reduced
to sloppy arguments about brain surgeons who drive taxis and lawyers who stand in kebab kitchens.
It is true that it is a huge waste of resources that there are foreign born
people with a high level of education who today work with much simpler tasks.
At the same time, we must never forget that many highly qualified jobs, especially
those where you work with people and the exercise of authority, require extensive
informal knowledge and understanding of both language and society so that it does not
will be wrong. A doctor must be able to communicate with seriously ill people and be able to
take in all the information found in medical records and provided by colleagues,
often in stressful situations. A lawyer must know the Swedish law book and
conduct in-depth conversations with clients as well as the police and a number of other agencies.
Often also sees both education and practical professional work for the highly qualified
completely different in the countries in Asia and Africa from which many immigrants come.
It certainly feels difficult to be forced to start over with several years of studies
when you come to Sweden with half a professional life in your luggage, but Sweden never gets
insist that the same requirements must apply to everyone in a profession regardless of where one was born
or have trained. The language is almost always the key. The foreign-born who
unable to find it must be able to accept a less qualified job. So
It's simple." A doctor must be able to communicate with seriously ill people and
be able to take in all the information contained in medical records and provided by colleagues"


Racist ideas have received a new packaging
Katrineholms-Kuriren, 2021

LEADER

Biological racism is unusual in Sweden. Its open ranking of people from outside
physical characteristics are morally bankrupt and not viable outside of small sects.
And very few, even in the white power milieu, put up with being called racists. But
racism remains. It just takes other forms. "Ras" is replaced by functional
counterparts such as culture and religion. The pursuit of ethnic purity wears
in slippery reasoning about "demographics". However, the basic assumptions are the same. The
is about a hierarchical division of people groups into better and worse. People
are considered, because of their group affiliation, to carry inherited and unchanging characteristics
that determine their values ​​and actions. Of this performance
it follows that different ethnic groups cannot and should not live together. The delegation
for Migration Policy Studies (Delmi) is an independent committee formed by
the second Reinfeldt government. Its mission includes compiling knowledge overviews
based on research in various areas directly or indirectly linked to
migration. This week, Delmi presented such a report, as part of a project
funded by the Swedish Research Council. It's about how racist and xenophobic
performances are normalized in the public, including by established actors.
It describes how the flora of so-called "alternative media" has grown and
influenced public discussions online about various conflicts between people,
crime, social unrest. Using a selective selection of news, repackaged into well-chosen
angles that encourage engagement and dissemination, they have created a comprehensive
infrastructure for communication and xenophobic mobilization. More
however, the incursion of racist figures of thought into previously well-regarded newspapers is serious
and with established writers. In Swedish research, Svenska Dagbladet's is highlighted
and Göteborgs-Posten's editorial pages in particular. Various social problems such as unemployment,
crime, including sex crimes, has in recent years been presented there
as immigrant problems. What is called "unsuccessful integration" often boils down to
the conclusion - often implied - that the immigrants do not want and cannot stay
part of Swedish society. The racist thesis of "people exchange" appears
in the form of worried reasoning about "rapid demographic change" where the focus is,
again, on origin, group characteristics, immutability and the impossibility of coexistence.
Sometimes this thoughtlessly is expressed openly, as Per Gudmundson's (then SvD)
tweet in 2015 about the "downfall of the nation" as a result of theoretically large immigration
to Sweden. Significantly more often, this mindset is dressed in linguistically more versed,
preferably in pseudo-academic garb. Delmi makes a valuable contribution to the discussion.
Racist beliefs of this lightly masked type need to be exposed and
called for what they are. Only then can they face the opposition they deserve.


Kajsa Kettil: That flowering time comes thanks to teaching in the mother tongue
Borås Newspaper, 2021

It is well thought out to expand the study guide in the mother tongue in Borås.

Two children in my circle of acquaintances came to Sweden a few years ago. They are siblings,
and arrived a couple of years after the father applied for asylum here. The family ended up in Sjuhärad,
the children started in Swedish school and quickly made friends. At the beginning of their
first school year, the father had to translate for the children, who were of primary school age. After
for a few months they were at the same level. When the children then sang The flower time now comes
at the end of school they did it like expectant, jittery elementary school kids
any. The sweet summer was approaching for them as well. Precisely that school graduation
I was extra proud, and not only as a parent, but as a Swede. think that
that, despite extensive integration challenges after the migration peak of 2015, nevertheless
works well in many places. Think all those adaptable kids on the side
of their original culture absorbs our language and our habits, and how they under
his lifetime will enrich our common Sweden. This is not a text
for or against migration. Nor about which requirements should be made more clearly
adults who immigrate to Sweden to learn the language and become employable.
We can discuss that at another time. This text is about one of many
puzzle pieces that contribute to functional integration: language development in children
and young people. The best both for the individual and for society at large
is that learning takes place as smoothly as possible. The individual comes faster
into the community, at a lower cost to the public. Previously, most were
agreed that regular teaching in the mother tongue was a natural part of those concerned
the students' schooling, because it sped up the learning process both in Swedish
and in other subjects. In recent years, mother tongue teaching has been questioned,
mainly by the Sweden Democrats but also the Christian Democrats. Last year KD proposed
that teaching in the mother tongue should be discontinued. The party pointed out that there is
shortcomings in the quality of mother tongue teaching in some areas, which is true. More
puzzling is that KD questioned the research that claims that the master
both their mother tongue and Swedish do better in school overall. For example
claimed party secretary Peter Kullgren in Ekot, before KD's party council in
October, that the research in the area is not clear-cut. The statement led to backlash
- four native language researchers at Uppsala University refuted the claim and
argued, on the contrary, that developed knowledge of the mother tongue also benefited learning
in other subjects. Against this background, it is welcome that the city of Borås is on its way
to correct some of the shortcomings in the support for pupils with a mother tongue other than
Swedish. Today, the municipal council is expected to make a decision on the supplementary budget in total
26 million for primary school as well as upper secondary and adult education which was presented
the beginning of May. The primary school receives 21 million, and of this CFL, Centrum receives
for multilingual learning, 1 million. It is a much needed addition. Through the CFL
students receive study guidance in their own mother tongue, but as BT has told us
on the news site, many students have been left without this support due to a lack of resources. Med
considering the aforementioned research, it would be unwise to cut back on measures that
makes it more difficult for young people to assimilate knowledge at school. Without
passing grades from elementary school, and without a high school diploma, it's honest
right driven to get a job. In addition, the withdrawal or reduced support for, for example, affects
new arrivals not only the students concerned. Their classmates are also affected
in the form of poorer teaching when the teacher needs to devote himself to the linguistically weaker
the students who otherwise risk falling behind. Because that is hardly the case with the school's pedagogues
the problem lies. On the contrary, they testify to a frustration of wanting but
not getting sufficient conditions to teach. The teacher Ahmed Sheikh tells
for BT how they look for creative solutions: "We meet them every day in the corridor
and tries to help them secretly. If I'm going to meet another student in the same class
can I tell anyone who doesn't have study guidance to get there at the same time."Also
children and young people with a mother tongue other than Swedish must be given reasonable chances to pass
school. It requires good knowledge of the Swedish language, but the way there is possible
partially go via one's own mother tongue. Psalm 199, i.e. The flower time now comes,
may well be considered to be among the most Swedish Swedish culture has to offer. Then
may we assume that also those in power who emphasise the importance of immigrant people
learns our language and customs, is familiar with the end of the fourth of the psalm
verse:Give love to the heart that no love receives.Turn away all sorrow and pain,
you friend who can do everything. Even children and young people with a mother tongue other than Swedish
should be given reasonable chances to pass school. It requires good knowledge of Swedish
the language, but the way there can partly go via one's own mother tongue."Kajsa Kettil


Västerbottens-Kuriren, 2021

INTEGRATION. Sweden needs a real debate about integration. Because no, it is spoken
almost never about integration.

There is talk of migration, of volumes, of limiting and making it difficult for people to
escape to come here. The refugee issue and migration have been at the center of Swedish
debate for several years now, without almost ever being about integration - for real.
It has gone so far that, for example, Ulf Kristersson (M) claims that
the far-reaching measures they want to see to make immigration more difficult would benefit integration.
This despite the fact that virtually all the austerity measures implemented by the government,
and the additional measures proposed by M, KD, SD and L, rather complicate
integration. We see for ourselves how the cuts in the reception of refugees affect
people in Ångermanland when the Migration Agency shuts down operations and moves
around people without considering the consequences for the individual people. Individual
persons, affected by the trauma due to war, persecution, the flight itself is affected
again. Young men who came to Sweden as teenagers, who have learned Swedish
and received high school education are sent to an Afghanistan where they have never been
because they fail to do the near-impossible during a pandemic – getting one
permanent employment, in any occupation that does not require more than high school qualifications.
These unaccompanied minors are a group in which most have fought extremely hard to integrate,
this despite declining support from society. Yet they are thrown out into an uncertain
future. At the same time that migration is made into a problem that must be prevented to almost
every price is blamed on the problems that can arise in connection with migration
on "bad integration policy". But it is the same politician who says that integration
works poorly that puts forward suggestions on how it can become even worse.
take away from new arrivals and others who are not Swedish citizens basic economic
support such as child support does not promote integration. Especially not for the children
who instead end up in, if possible, even greater exclusion and poverty than they would otherwise
should have done. In combination with temporary residence permits as such
creates uncertainty and anxiety, there is nothing to indicate that integration will come
to function better than today. At the same time, we have shortcomings in the bureaucracy that surrounds immigrants
people, so that those who have jobs and housing and function well in society
thrown out because of small clauses about pay levels and terms of employment.Integration
is not to adopt Swedish values ​​or opinions. It doesn't need to
rather be able to speak perfect Swedish. Integration is to be given opportunities to get
a place in society, housing, work and for the children good opportunities to come
into Swedish society through a good school and other activities. Not through
to take benefits away from people and create unnecessary mental illness due to concern for
the future and constant break-ups. Sweden has become a country that at a fairly high rate
are introducing laws and regulations that create a form of second-class man,
who should not have the same rights as others. How will the children grow
up in that society to be affected? The children who suffer from exclusion, but also
the children who watch and learn that you can certainly treat fellow human beings like that?
